Missouri, session 2026, HB3380.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 221, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 221.356, to read as follows:
221.356. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be referred to
as the "No More Jail Deaths Act".
2. Except as provided in subsections 3, 4, and 5 of this section, no person shall be
permitted to enter a jail or detention facility of a city not within a county except by
special permission of the chief administrative officer of the jail or detention facility
under rules or regulations as such officer shall prescribe.
3. The following persons shall be authorized to visit the jails or detention
facilities of a city not within a county at any time:
(1) Authorized employees of the city not within a county;
(2) The chief executive officer of the city not within a county;
(3) The governor;
(4) The lieutenant governor;
(5) The attorney general;
(6) The state auditor;
(7) The state treasurer;
(8) The secretary of state;
(9) Members of the general assembly;
(10) The director of the department of public safety;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3380 2
(11) The commissioners of the department of elementary and secondary
education;
(12) The commissioners of the department of higher education and workforce
development;
(13) The adjutant general of the state;
(14) Judges of the supreme court, courts of appeal, and circuit courts; and
(15) Circuit and prosecuting attorneys.
4. The assistants of any person named in subsection 3 of this section shall be
authorized to visit a jail or detention facility of a city not within a county at any
reasonable time as specifically authorized by their superiors and in accordance with
rules and regulations established by the chief administrative officer of the jail or
detention facility.
5. All clergy of every recognized denomination shall be authorized to visit a jail
or detention facility of a city not within a county and may visit any offender confined in
any such jail or detention facility, subject to such rules or regulations as may be deemed
necessary for maintaining security and safety in the jail or detention facility. Such
clergy may administer the rites and ceremonies of the church to which they belong, if
such offender desires it and it is in compliance with rules or regulations of the jail or
detention facility.
6. The governing authority of a city not within a county that operates a jail or
detention facility shall adopt or update rules or regulations consistent with this section
no later than March 1, 2027, and submit a copy thereof to the department of public
safety for archival purposes. The department of public safety shall have authority to
provide guidance and may review the rules or regulations for consistency with state
standards.
✔